Utah statutes.
78B-15-807.   Parentage under validated gestational agreement.

(1)  Upon birth of a child to a gestational mother, the intended parents shall file notice with the tribunal that a child has been born to the gestational mother within 300 days after assisted reproduction.  Thereupon, the tribunal shall issue an order:

(a)  confirming that the intended parents are the parents of the child;

(b)  if necessary, ordering that the child be surrendered to the intended parents; and

(c)  directing the Office of Vital Records to issue a birth certificate naming the intended parents as parents of the child.

(2)  If the parentage of a child born to the gestational mother is in dispute as not the result of an assisted reproduction, the tribunal shall order genetic testing to determine the parentage of the child.

